South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3267.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 38-77-140(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) An automobile insurance policy may not be issued or delivered in this State to the owner of a motor vehicle or may not be issued or delivered by an insurer licensed in this State upon a motor vehicle then principally garaged or principally used in this State, unless it contains a provision insuring the persons defined as insured against loss from the liability imposed by law for damages arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of these motor vehicles within the United States or Canada, subject to limits exclusive of interest and costs, with respect to each motor vehicle, as follows: (1) twenty-five thousand dollars because of bodily injury to one person in any one accident and, subject to the limit for one person; (2) fifty thousand dollars because of bodily injury to two or more persons in any one accident;  and (3) twenty-five thousand dollars because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one accident; and (4) one hundred fifty thousand dollars because of bodily injury resulting in death for each person involved. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----